Utah statutes.
54-8b-14.   Intrastate interexchange toll service prices.

(1)  Prices for intrastate interexchange message toll services transmitted between two specific points shall be the same regardless of the point of origin.

(2)  Subsection (1) applies only to services provided by telecommunications corporations subject to the jurisdiction of the commission.

